Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9080. HALL AND DONLEY COUNTIES WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 1 OF HALL AND DONLEY COUNTIES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9080.0001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Hall and Donley Counties Water Control and Improvement District No. 1 of Hall and Donley Counties.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9080.0002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district established under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9080.0003. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC PURPOSE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is essential to the accomplishment of the preservation and conservation of the natural resources of this state.

(b) All land and other property in the district will benefit from the district and the district's improvements and from the preservation and conservation of the natural resources of this state.

(c) This chapter addresses a subject in which the state is interested.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9080.0004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 2, Chapter 189, Acts of the 59th Legislature, Regular Session, 1965, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter O, Chapter 51, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The district includes all land and property in the district's territory.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9080.0005. LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION OF CHAPTER. This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the purpose and objectives stated in this chapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 9080.0051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The district's board of directors is composed of five elected directors.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 9080.0101. GENERAL POWERS. The district may exercise the powers essential to the accomplishment of the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and may exercise the rights, powers, privileges, and functions implied by that section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 9080.0102. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT POWERS. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, and functions provided by general law applicable to a water control and improvement district, including Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9080.0151. TAX METHOD. (a) The district shall use the ad valorem plan of taxation.

(b) The district is not required to have a hearing on the plan of taxation.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2021.